Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-189
Washington.

The county of Washington is bounded as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of section thirty, township twenty, north, range nine, east; thence east on a line parallel with the dividing line between townships nineteen and twenty, and two miles north of the same, to the eastern boundary line of the State of Nebraska as established by the Iowa-Nebraska Boundary Compact of 1943; thence south along the eastern boundary line of the State of Nebraska to a point where the dividing line between townships sixteen and seventeen intersects the same; thence west to the southeast corner of section thirty-one, township seventeen, north, range ten, east; thence north on section lines three miles, to the northeast corner of section nineteen, township seventeen, north, range ten, east; thence west on section lines two miles to the southwest corner of section thirteen, township seventeen, range nine, east; thence north on section lines one mile, to northwest corner of section thirteen, last aforesaid; thence west on section line one mile to southwest corner of section eleven, township seventeen, north, range nine, east; thence north on section line one mile, to the northwest corner of said section eleven, last aforesaid; thence west on section lines one mile, to the southwest corner of section three, township seventeen, north, range nine, east; thence north on section lines one mile, to the northwest corner of said section three; thence west on section line one mile, to the northwest corner of section four, township seventeen, north, range nine, east; thence north on section line one mile, to the northeast corner of section thirty-two, township eighteen, north, range nine, east; thence west one-half mile on section line, to the northwest corner of the northeast quarter of section thirty-two, township eighteen, north, range nine, east; thence north on the half section line two miles, to the southeast corner of the southwest quarter of section seventeen, township eighteen, north, range nine, east; thence west on section line one-half mile, to the southwest corner of section seventeen, township eighteen, north, range nine, east; and thence north to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 53, p. 222;

Laws 1887, c. 25, § 1, p. 348;

R.S. 1913, § 904;

C.S.1922, § 806;

C.S.1929, § 25-193;

R.S.1943, § 22-189;

Laws 1955, c. 65, § 8, p. 215.

Boundary of state, when middle of river, follows gradual changes, but not sudden changes of channel. Rober v. Michelsen, 82 Neb. 48, 116 N.W. 949 (1908).